Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-322.01
Financial analysis ratios; examination synopses; confidentiality; immunity.

(1) All financial analysis ratios and examination synopses concerning insurance companies that are submitted to the director by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners which are determined by such association to be confidential may not be disclosed or released for public inspection by the director.

(2) In the absence of actual malice, members of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, the association's duly authorized committees, subcommittees, task forces, delegates, and employees, and all others charged with the responsibility of collecting, reviewing, analyzing, and disseminating the information developed from the filing of the annual statement convention blanks are acting as agents of the director and shall not be subject to civil liability for libel, slander, or any cause of action by virtue of their collection, review, and analysis or dissemination of the data and information collected from the filings required of insurance companies under the insurance laws of this state or similar laws of other states.

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 9.